Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 2 INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
25.5-10-209.3. Cross-system behavioral health crisis response - comprehensive care coordination and treatment model - training - legislative declaration.

The general assembly declares that persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities and co-occurring behavioral health diagnoses and needs:

Experience limited access to appropriate treatment, including crisis intervention, stabilization, and prevention, and such individuals who live in rural areas of Colorado are particularly impacted by this limited access to appropriate treatment;

Deserve to live, work, play, and thrive in their communities;

Require a heightened level of care;

Require evidence-based treatment to help lead full lives within their communities; and

Experience significant gaps in care, including a lack of access to appropriate treatment.

Therefore, as a preliminary measure to close these gaps in care, the general assembly finds that the state must invest in extensive, expanded training using a comprehensive model of care that is available via teleconference. The training must be available for up to thirty individuals across the state in order to adequately address the limited access to treatment in rural areas.

As soon as possible, the state department shall obtain a vendor to provide extensive statewide training to professional persons who work with persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities and co-occurring behavioral health needs.

A qualified vendor must:

Utilize a comprehensive care coordination and treatment model that is evidence-based;

Be able to show demonstrated success in multiple states;

Have experience with rural issues;

Have at least ten years of experience working with professionals who work with individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities;

Maintain a national database that involves the standardized collection, analysis, and reporting of outcomes associated with the impact of the training on the individuals being served; and

Be able to provide the training statewide using teleconference technology.

No later than sixty calendar days after a vendor is obtained pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, case management agencies, mental health centers, and other program-approved service agencies in the state shall nominate one provider in their geographic service area to be trained in the comprehensive care coordination and treatment model designed and provided by the vendor selected pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. Up to twenty providers may be selected for training pursuant to this subsection (3)(a). Selected providers must have a clinical background and prior experience working with the intellectual and developmental disabilities population. If more than twenty providers are nominated through this process, the state department shall make final selections, giving preference to providers in underserved areas.

The state department shall coordinate with case management agencies in underserved areas of the state to select an additional ten providers to be trained in the comprehensive care coordination and treatment model.

Participating providers shall complete the training provided no later than one calendar year after a provider is nominated pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section.

The state department shall reimburse participating providers at the provider's current pay rate for time spent in training.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1166), ch. 234, p. 1233, § 1, effective June 15.

L. 2022:

(2)(a), (3)(a), and (4) amended, (HB 22-1189), ch. 15, p. 126, § 1, effective August 10.

25.5-10-209.5. Case management agencies - certification - purchase of services and supports - rules - repeal.

In order to be certified as a case management agency, a public or private for-profit or not-for-profit agency shall apply for certification to the state department in the form and manner specified by the executive director. The state board shall promulgate rules for certification and decertification of case management agencies.

Once certified pursuant to this section, a case management agency shall, subject to available appropriations:

Determine the needs of a person enrolled in home- and community-based services who selects the case management agency; and

Provide case management services and periodic reviews pursuant to section 25.5-10-211.

The executive director or his or her designee shall review each case management agency to ensure that the agency complies with the requirements and standards set forth in this article 10 and the rules promulgated pursuant to this article 10.

The state board shall promulgate rules to ensure that:

Each enrolled person with an intellectual and developmental disability has access to case management services;

A person who is enrolled in home- and community-based services and other programs, as defined in section 25.5-10-202, is not required to have multiple case managers; and

There is an established process for a person to select the case management agency of his or her choice.

The state board shall begin promulgating rules for case management agencies on June 5, 2017.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1343), ch. 320, p. 1725, § 7, effective June 5.

L. 2021:

(6) added by revision, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, pp. 353, 354, §§ 69, 70.

25.5-10-210. Revocation of designation - repeal.

The executive director may revoke the designation of a community-centered board upon a finding that the community-centered board is in violation of the provisions of this article and the rules promulgated thereunder. Such revocation shall conform to the provisions and procedures specified in article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., and shall be made only after a hearing is provided as specified in that article.

Once a designation has been revoked pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the executive director may designate a service agency to perform the case management services of the designated community-centered board pending designation of a new community-centered board.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1762, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2021:

(3) added by revision, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, pp. 353, 354, §§ 69, 70.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-105.5 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-211. Eligibility determination - individualized plan - periodic review - rules - repeal.

Any person may request an evaluation to determine whether he or she has an intellectual and developmental disability and is eligible to receive services and supports pursuant to this article 10. The person must apply for eligibility determination to the designated community-centered board in the designated service area where the person resides.

Pursuant to the contract with the state department, designated community-centered boards shall determine whether a person is eligible to receive services and supports pursuant to this article 10. For persons eligible for services and supports other than home- and community-based services, the designated community-centered board shall develop an individualized plan for him or her as part of his or her enrollment into a program.

For a person eligible for and authorized to receive home- and community-based services, designated community-centered boards shall refer the person to a third-party entity for selection of a case management agency.

Following intake and assessment, pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section, the designated community-centered board or the case management agency chosen by the person shall develop an individualized plan as provided by rules promulgated by the state board. The designated community-centered board shall develop an individualized family service plan for a child with disabilities from birth through two years of age pursuant to section 26.5-3-403.

The case management agency shall develop an individualized plan for persons enrolled in home- and community-based services.

The designated community-centered board shall develop an individualized plan for persons eligible for other programs, as defined in section 25.5-10-202, and for a child with disabilities from birth through two years of age pursuant to section 26.5-3-403.

(2.5) The state board shall promulgate rules pursuant to article 4 of title 24 setting forth the procedure and criteria for determination of eligibility and individualized plan development. The procedure and criteria must be uniform in nature and applied throughout the state in a consistent manner. The procedure and criteria established by the state board must conform with the provisions of section 25.5-10-211.5 relating to conflict-free case management.

Subject to available appropriations pursuant to section 25.5-10-206 and to the capacity of an individual service agency, the person with an intellectual and developmental disability must be provided options for services and supports within the designated service area that can appropriately meet the person's identified needs, as identified pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, and may select the case management agency and service agency from which to receive services or supports.

Each person receiving services must receive periodic and adequate reviews to ascertain whether the services and supports specified in the person's individualized plan have been provided, determine the appropriateness of current services and supports, identify whether the outcomes specified in the person's individualized plan have been achieved, and modify and revise current services or supports to meet the identified needs and preferences of the person receiving services. The designated community-centered board shall develop modifications or revisions to the individualized family service plan for a child with disabilities from birth through two years of age pursuant to section 26.5-3-403.

In order to accurately review the services and supports being provided, the community-centered board or regional center may make cognitive, physical, medical, behavioral, social, vocational, educational, or other necessary types of evaluations of a person receiving services. An intellectual and developmental disabilities professional shall supervise the reviews. The person receiving services, the parents or guardian of a minor, or the guardian of the person receiving services, and the authorized representative of the person receiving services may attend and shall receive adequate advance notice of the reviews. Parental or legal guardian consent must be obtained prior to administering evaluations for program review to minors. The results of a review must be given to the person receiving services and to the person's parent, or guardian, as appropriate, and must be made a part of the person's record.

A person's individualized plan must be reviewed at least annually; except that an individualized family service plan for a child with disabilities from birth through two years of age must be reviewed as required pursuant to part 4 of article 3 of title 26.5.

An individualized plan is not required for a person with intellectual and developmental disabilities who is eligible for supports and services and who is on a waiting list for enrollment into a program funded pursuant to this article. Each community-centered board shall provide information and referral services to each person on the waiting list for enrollment in a program, at the time of his or her eligibility and annually thereafter, regarding services and supports that are relevant to persons and are commonly used by persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities as provided by rules promulgated by the state board. The criteria for information and referral shall be uniform in nature and applied throughout the state in a consistent manner.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1762, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2017:

(1), (2), and (3) amended and (2.5) added, (HB 17-1343), ch. 320, p. 1726, § 8, effective June 5.

L. 2021:

(6) added by revision, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, pp. 353, 354, §§ 69, 70.

L. 2022:

(2)(a), (2)(b)(II), (4)(a), and (4)(c) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 849, § 78, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-106 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-211.5. Conflict-free case management - implementation - legislative declaration - definition - repeal.

The general assembly acknowledges the rights of individuals to make choices regarding their case management agency and service agency. Therefore, the general assembly believes there exists the need to ensure conflict-free case management services within the medicaid waivers for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "rural community-centered board" means a community-centered board comprised primarily of counties designated by the state office of rural health as a rural or frontier county.

A conflict-free case management system shall be implemented in Colorado as follows:

No later than July 1, 2017, the state department shall determine the options for community-centered boards to become compliant with conflict-free case management;

No later than January 1, 2018, the state department shall publish guidance on the components of a business continuity plan;

No later than July 1, 2018, each community-centered board shall submit a business continuity plan to the state department based on the best option for the community-centered board pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section;

Once a community-centered board has submitted its business continuity plan, on or before June 30, 2019, the state department shall complete an analysis of the adequacy of the continuity plan, unreimbursed transition costs, and community impacts of the transition to conflict-free case management;

No later than June 30, 2020, a community-centered board shall complete any necessary changes to its business operation that are required to implement its business continuity plan;

No later than June 30, 2021, at least twenty-five percent of clients receiving home- and community-based services must be served through a system of conflict-free case management; and

No later than June 30, 2022, all clients receiving home- and community-based services must be served through a system of conflict-free case management.

Rural-based services - exemption.

The state department is authorized to seek a federal exemption from conflict-free case management requirements for geographic areas within the state where the only willing and qualified entity to provide case management services is also the only willing and qualified entity to provide home- and community-based services in that geographic area.

A rural community-centered board must initially notify the state department in writing, no later than July 1, 2017, to request that the state department seek a federal exemption for its designated service area, as defined in section 25.5-10-202. Upon receipt of the notice, the state department shall evaluate case management service provider capacity, and, if the state department determines that it is supported, the state department shall seek a federal exemption for its designated service area within a reasonable period of time.

Upon notification of federal approval or denial of a federal exemption from conflict-free case management requirements, the rural community-centered board shall submit a business continuity plan and commence any necessary changes to its business operation pursuant to subsection (3)(e) of this section.

The state board shall promulgate rules for the provision of services and supports, including services and supports coordination, when there are multiple agencies operating in a specified geographic area.

If the state department has not received notification by July 1, 2019, regarding approval or denial for a federal exemption from conflict-free case management requirements, the state board shall promulgate rules for the provision of services and supports, including services and supports coordination, for designated service areas where a federal exemption from conflict-free case management is pending.

In order to ensure stability, client choice, and access to services in rural communities, the state board shall promulgate rules, as permitted under federal law, that allow a qualified entity to provide both case management services and home- and community-based services to the same individual if there is insufficient choice or capacity among existing service agencies or case management agencies serving a designated service area of a rural community-centered board.

The state board shall amend its rules consistent with changes in federal law as set forth in 42 CFR (c)(1)(VI), including changes relating to allowable exemptions.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1343), ch. 320, p. 1727, § 9, effective June 5.

L. 2021:

(6) added by revision, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, pp. 353, 354, §§ 69, 70.

25.5-10-212. Procedure for resolving disputes over eligibility, modification of services or supports, and termination of services or supports.

Every state or local service agency receiving state money pursuant to section 25.5-10-206 shall adopt a procedure for the resolution of disputes arising between the service agency and any recipient of, or applicant for, services or supports authorized pursuant to section 25.5-10-206. Procedures for the resolution of disputes regarding early intervention services must comply with IDEA and with part 4 of article 3 of title 26.5. The procedures must be consistent with rules promulgated by the state board pursuant to article 4 of title 24 and must apply to the following disputes:

A contested decision that the applicant is not eligible for services or supports;

A contested decision to provide, modify, reduce, or deny services or supports set forth in the individualized plan or individualized family service plan of the person receiving services;

A contested decision to terminate services or supports;

A contested decision that the person receiving services is no longer eligible for services or supports.

The state board shall promulgate rules pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., setting forth procedures for the resolution of disputes specified in subsection (1) of this section that must:

Require that all applicants for services and supports and the parents or guardian of a minor, the guardian, or an authorized representative be informed orally and in writing, in their native language, of the dispute resolution procedures at the time of application, at the time the individualized plan is developed, and any time changes in the plan are contemplated;

Require that a service agency keep a written record of all proceedings specified pursuant to this section;

Require that no person receiving services be terminated from such services or supports during the resolution process;

Require that utilizing the dispute resolution procedure must not prejudice the future provision of appropriate services or supports to persons; and

Require that the intended action not occur until after reasonable notice has been provided to the person, the parents or guardian of a minor, the guardian, or an authorized representative, along with an opportunity to utilize the resolution process, except in emergency situations, as determined by the state department.

The resolution process need not conform to the requirements of section 24-4-105, C.R.S., as long as the rules adopted by the state board include provisions specifically setting forth procedures, time frames, notice, an opportunity to be heard and to present evidence, and the opportunity for impartial review of the decision in dispute by the executive director or designee, if the resolution process has failed.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1764, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2022:

IP(1) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 849, § 79, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-107 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-213. Discharge - repeal.

A person receiving services must be discharged from services or supports upon a determination, made pursuant to the individualized planning process, that the services or supports are no longer appropriate. At least ten days prior to effectuation of the discharge, notification of discharge must be given to the person receiving services, the parents or guardian of such a person who is a minor, and the person's legal guardian and authorized representative when applicable.

When a person receiving services notifies a service agency that the person no longer wishes to receive a service or support, the person must be discharged from the service or support unless the person is subject to a petition to impose a legal disability or to remove a legal right, filed pursuant to section 25.5-10-216, or for whom a legal guardian has been appointed, affecting the person's ability to voluntarily terminate services or supports. The parents of the person receiving services who is a minor and such person's guardian must be notified of the person's wish to terminate services or supports, but no minor will be discharged without the consent of the parent or legal guardian.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1765, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2021:

(3) added by revision, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, pp. 353, 354, §§ 69, 70.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-108 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-214. Community residential home - licenses - rules.

The department of public health and environment and the state department shall implement a system of joint licensure and certification of community residential homes. Independent residential support services provided by the state department do not require licensure by the department of public health and environment.

The department of public health and environment and the state department shall develop standards for the licensure and certification of community residential homes. The standards shall include health, life, and fire safety, as well as standards to ensure the effective delivery of services and supports to residents; except that any community residential home must comply with local codes.

The state department or the state board of health, as appropriate, shall adopt the standards by rule and shall specify the responsibilities of each department in the program. Surveys undertaken to ensure compliance with these standards shall, as appropriate, be undertaken as joint surveys by the departments.

If a service agency operates a community residential home and provides personal care services, as defined in section 25-27.5-102, C.R.S., the department of public health and environment or the state department, as appropriate, is responsible for surveying those services provided by the service agency, which survey shall be conducted simultaneously with the survey of the community residential home.

Any community residential home applying for a license or certification on or after January 1, 1986, shall accommodate at least four but no more than eight persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities. All licenses and certificates issued by the department of public health and environment or the state department shall bear the date of issuance and shall be valid for not more than a twenty-four-month period.

The issuance, suspension, revocation, modification, renewal, or denial of a license or certification shall be governed by the provisions of section 24-4-104, C.R.S. The failure of a community residential home to comply with the provisions of this article and the rules promulgated thereunder, or any local fire, safety, and health codes shall be sufficient grounds for the department of public health and environment or the state department to deny, suspend, revoke, or modify the community residential home's license or certification.

The state department and the state board of health shall promulgate such rules as are necessary to implement this section, pursuant to the provisions specified in article 4 of title 24, C.R.S. The rules shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

Requirements concerning the distance between the location of community residential homes and factors to be considered in waiving such requirements for existing community residential homes;

Procedures to secure the health and safety of persons receiving services or supports residing in a community residential home in the event the community residential home closes or its license is denied, suspended, or revoked pursuant to this section; and

Prohibiting the cultivation, use, or consumption of retail marijuana on the premises of a community residential home.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1765, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

25.5-10-215. Compliance with local government zoning regulations - notice to local governments - provisional licensure.

The state department shall require any community residential home seeking licensure pursuant to section 25.5-10-214 to comply with any applicable zoning regulations of the municipality, city and county, or county where the home is situated. Failure to comply with applicable zoning regulations shall constitute grounds for the denial of a license to a home; except that nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede the provisions of sections 30-28-115 (2), 31-23-301 (4), and 31-23-303 (2), C.R.S.

The state department shall ensure that timely written notice is provided to the municipality, city and county, or county where a community residential home is situated, including the address of the home and the population and number of persons to be served by the home, when any of the following occurs:

An application for a license to operate a community residential home pursuant to section 25.5-10-214 is made;

A license is granted to a community residential home pursuant to section 25.5-10-214;

A change in the license of a community residential home occurs; or

The license of a community residential home is revoked or otherwise terminated for any reason.

In the event of a zoning or other delay or dispute between a community residential home and the municipality, city and county, or county where the home is situated, the state department may grant a provisional license to the home for up to one hundred twenty days pending resolution of the delay or dispute.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1767, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-109.5 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-216. Imposition of legal disability - removal of legal right.

Any interested person may petition the court to impose a legal disability on or to remove a legal right from a person with an intellectual and developmental disability as defined in section 25.5-10-202. The petition must set forth the disability to be imposed or the legal right to be removed and the reasons therefor. The petition may affect the right to contract, the right to determine place of abode or provisions of services and supports, the right to operate a motor vehicle, and other similar rights.

Prior to granting the petition, the court must find:

That the person subject to the petition has been determined to be a person with an intellectual and developmental disability pursuant to the provisions of this article; and

That the requested disability or removal is both necessary and desirable to implement the individualized plan developed for the person receiving services or supports under the supervision of an intellectual and developmental disabilities professional and the interdisciplinary team. Such professional must have an understanding of the rights of persons receiving services as set forth in sections 25.5-10-218 to 25.5-10-229. Such plan must be submitted to the court and must be signed by the intellectual and developmental disabilities professional.

When a petition filed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section seeks to impose a disability or to remove a legal right, related to the selection of place of abode by the person with an intellectual and developmental disability, the court must also find:

That, based on the recent overt actions or omissions of the person subject to the petition, and because of the presence of an intellectual and developmental disability, without the relief requested in the petition such person poses a probable threat of serious physical harm to such person or others or is unable to care for such person's own needs to the extent that such person's own life or safety is seriously threatened; and

That the place of abode requested in the petition is the least restrictive residential setting that is appropriate for the individual needs of the person with an intellectual and developmental disability.

Within six months after a legal disability has been imposed or a legal right has been removed, the court shall hold a hearing to review its order and either reaffirm the findings made pursuant to subsection (2) of this section and continue the legal disability or removal or remove the legal disability or restore the legal rights to the person subject to the petition. The court may remove a legal disability from or restore a legal right to a person without a hearing upon the filing of a motion requesting such relief containing affidavits in support of the motion signed by all of the parties.

Any interested person may move that the court remove a legal disability or restore a legal right. If such motion is contested, it must be served on the person whose rights are affected and upon the party who filed the original petition if the person is not the moving party.

The following procedures must apply to any proceedings instituted pursuant to this section:

When a petition is filed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the person subject to the petition shall be advised by the court of such person's right to retain and consult with an attorney at any time, and that if such person cannot afford to pay an attorney, one will be appointed by the court without cost. Attorney fees for court-appointed counsel shall be paid by the court.

Upon the request of an indigent respondent or such respondent's attorney, the court shall appoint one or more intellectual and developmental disabilities professionals of the respondent's choice to assist the respondent in the preparation of the respondent's case. The court shall pay the fees for such intellectual and developmental disabilities professionals.

The court may issue a temporary order imposing a legal disability or removing a legal right, pending a hearing, for a period not to exceed ten days, based upon the standards required for issuance of a temporary restraining order. No individualized plan shall be required by the court to support the issuance of such order.

The burden of proof is at all times upon the party seeking imposition of a disability or removal of a legal right or opposing removal of a disability or restoration of a legal right, and the standard of proof is by clear and convincing evidence.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (5), all proceedings must be held in conformance with the Colorado rules of civil procedure, but no costs must be assessed against the respondent.

In order to provide representation to eligible persons as provided in this section, the judicial department may pay moneys, out of appropriations made therefor by the general assembly, directly to appointed counsel or intellectual and developmental disabilities professionals on a case-by-case basis or, on behalf of the state, to contract with individual attorneys, legal partnerships, legal professional corporations, public interest law firms, or nonprofit legal services corporations to provide legal representation for an agreed-upon lump sum.

A person shall not be admitted to a regional center, as defined in section 27-10.5-102, C.R.S., without a court order issued pursuant to this section except in an emergency or for the purpose of temporary respite care.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1767, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-110 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-217. Conduct of court proceedings.

All court proceedings arising under section 25.5-10-216 shall be conducted by the district attorney of the county where the proceeding is held or by a qualified attorney acting for the district attorney appointed by the district court for that purpose; except that, in any county or in any city and county having a population exceeding one hundred thousand persons, the proceedings shall be conducted by the county attorney or by a qualified attorney acting for the county attorney appointed by the district court. In any case in which there has been a change of venue to a county other than the county of residence of the respondent or the county in which the proceeding was commenced, the county from which the proceeding was transferred shall either reimburse the county in which the proceeding was held for the reasonable costs incurred in conducting the proceeding or conduct the proceeding itself using its own personnel and resources, including its own district or county attorney, as the case may be.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1769, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-111 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-218. Persons' rights.

Unless a person's rights are modified by court order, a person with an intellectual and developmental disability has the same legal rights and responsibilities guaranteed to all other persons under the federal and state constitutions and federal and state laws. No otherwise qualified person, by reason of having an intellectual and developmental disability, may be excluded from participation in, denied the benefits of, or subjected to discrimination under any program or activity which receives public funds.

The receipt of services and supports pursuant to this article does not deprive any person of any other rights, benefits, or privileges or cause the person to be declared legally incompetent.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3) is effective until July 1, 2024.] The rights of any person receiving services which are specified in this article may be suspended to protect the person receiving services from endangering such person, others, or property. Such rights may be suspended only by the intellectual and developmental disabilities professional with subsequent review by the interdisciplinary team and by the human rights committee in order to provide specific services or supports to the person receiving services, which will promote the least restriction on the person's rights. Such person's legal rights may be removed by a court pursuant to section 25.5-10-216.

(3)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

The rights of any person receiving services which are specified in this article 10 may be modified to protect the person receiving services from endangering the person, others, or property. The rights may be modified only with the informed consent of the person receiving services or the person's legally authorized representative and with subsequent review by the person receiving services, the person's legally authorized representative, the person's interdisciplinary team, and by the human rights committee in order to provide specific services or supports to the person receiving services, which will promote the least restriction on the person's rights. The person's legal rights may be removed by a court pursuant to section 25.5-10-216.

None of the rights established pursuant to this article shall be construed to interfere with the rights and privileges of parents regarding their minor child.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1770, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 343, § 45, effective July 1, 2024.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-112 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-219. Right to individualized plan or individualized family service plan - repeal.

Each person receiving services must have an individualized plan, an individualized family service plan, or a similar plan specified by the state department that qualifies as an individualized plan that is developed by the person's interdisciplinary team. The individualized family service plan for a child with disabilities from birth through two years of age shall be developed in compliance with part 4 of article 3 of title 26.5.

Pursuant to section 25.5-10-211, the individualized plan for each person who receives services or supports shall be reviewed at least annually and modified as necessary or appropriate; except that an individualized family service plan for a child with disabilities from birth through two years of age shall be reviewed as required pursuant to part 4 of article 3 of title 26.5. A review consists of, but is not limited to, the determination by the interdisciplinary team as to whether the needs and preferences of the person receiving services or supports are accurately reflected in the plan, whether the services and supports provided pursuant to the plan are appropriate to meet the person's needs and preferences, and what actions are necessary for the plan to be achieved.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1770, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2021:

(3) added by revision, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, pp. 353, 354, §§ 69, 70.

L. 2022:

(1) and (2) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 850, § 80, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-113 as it existed prior to 2013.